Tennessee, session 114, SB0946.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 49, Chapter 6, Part 27, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
(a) An LEA that receives, from a threat assessment team or any other source,
credible information regarding a threat of violence or significantly disruptive behavior
directed toward, or occurring on the grounds of, a public school in the LEA, and that
reports the threat or disruptive behavior to a state or local law enforcement agency, must
also notify the parents and guardians of students enrolled in the public school of the
same threat or disruptive behavior the LEA reported to law enforcement.
(b) The LEA shall notify parents and guardians within twenty-four (24) hours of
the LEA's report to a state or local law enforcement agency, and may be made using
existing communication methods for providing information to parents and guardians.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0946
003193
- 1 -